Hawaii statutes.
§666-13 Effect of writ. Whenever a
writ is issued for the removal of any tenant, the contract for the use of the
premises, if any exists, and the relation of landlord and tenant between the
parties, shall be deemed to be canceled and annulled. [CC 1859, §945; RL 1925,
§2786; RL 1935, §4023; RL 1945, §10412; RL 1955, §240-13; HRS §666-13]

Case Notes

Warrant terminates relation of landlord and tenant only upon
final judgment for possession. 27 H. 362, 368 (1923). See 28 H. 160, 162
(1925).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next